North Carolina, session 2025, SB948.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-76.25(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-76.25. Parent legal rights for their child's education.
(a) Parents have legal rights with regards to their child's education, including the
following:
…
(13) The right to opt out of being issued a wireless communication device by a
school, any requirement that a student take a wireless communication device
home with them from school, or use of a wireless communication device for
testing or assessments except those assessments issued by the State for
compliance with federal law."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-76.100 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-76.100. Regulation of wireless communication devices.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Wireless communication device. – Any portable wireless device that has the
capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication between
two or more parties, including the following:
a. Cellular telephones.
b. Tablet computers.
c. Laptop computers.
d. Paging devices.
e. Two-way radios.
f. Gaming devices.
(2) Wireless communication policy. – A policy governing the use of wireless
communication devices by students.
(b) The governing body of a public school unit shall establish a wireless communication
policy. At a minimum, except as permitted in subsection (c) of this section, the policy shall
prohibit students from using, displaying, or having a wireless communication device turned on
during instructional time.time and include at least the following restrictions:
(1) For kindergarten through grade five, the following:
a. Prohibit students from using any wireless communication device in
classrooms.
*S948-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Require all instruction to be print-based and hands-on.
c. To the extent practicable, require all tests and assessments to be
conducted using printed materials.
(2) For grades six through eight, the following:
a. Allow that students may use wireless communication devices that are
shared between other students or classrooms. This excludes using their
own personal wireless communication device.
b. Prohibit schools from issuing wireless communication devices to
students.
c. Require that any wireless communication device that is owned or
contracted for use by a school and used for instructional purposes
restrict access to any non-instructional content, including social media
platforms and any shared video or media platforms.
d. Provide that the total amount of time that a student spends on any
wireless communication device during normal school hours shall be
less than one hour per school day.
e. Require that any wireless communication device owned or contracted
for use by a school shall remain on school premises at all times.
(3) For grades nine through 12, the following:
a. Allow a school to issue wireless communication devices to students
individually for instructional purposes.
b. Provide that the total amount of time that a student spends on any
wireless communication device during normal school hours shall be
less than one hour and 30 minutes per school day.
c. Require that a student's use of a school-issued wireless communication
device is only for instructional purposes.
d. Require that any assignments or homework that require the use of a
school-issued wireless communication device outside of normal
school hours shall not require a student to use such digital device for
more than one hour per day to complete the assignments or homework.
(c) A wireless communication policy shall allow student use of a wireless communication
device during instructional time as follows:
(1) If authorized by a teacher for educational purposes or for use in the event of
an emergency. The governing body may establish parameters to be followed
by a teacher in granting authorizations.
(2) As required by the student's individualized education program or section 504
(29 U.S.C. § 794) plan.
(3) As required to manage a student's health care, in accordance with a
documented medical condition.
(d) The governing body shall establish the consequences for violations of the wireless
communication policy, which may include confiscation of the wireless communication device
and disciplinary measures under the public school unit's Code of Student Conduct.
(e) No later than September 1 of the year in which this section becomes effective, every
public school unit shall send to the Department of Public Instruction a copy of the public school
unit's wireless communication policy. The public school unit shall provide the Department of
Public Instruction with a copy of the wireless communication policy anytime it is changed. No
later than October 1 of each year, the Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee the number of public school units that are in
compliance with this section and the name of any public school unit which is not in compliance
with this section."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-85 reads as rewritten:
Page 2 Senate Bill 948-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115C-85. Textbook needs are determined by course of study.
When the State Board of Education has adopted, upon the recommendation of the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, a standard course of study at each instructional level in the
elementary school and the secondary school, setting forth what subjects shall be taught at each
level, it shall proceed to select and adopt textbooks.
As used in this part, "textbook" means systematically organized material comprehensive
enough to cover the primary objectives outlined in the standard course of study for a grade or
course. Formats for textbooks may be print or nonprint, including hardbound books, softbound
books, activity-oriented programs, classroom kits, and technology-based programs that require
the use of electronic equipment in order to be used in the learning process.process, provided that
printed materials shall be used in all classrooms for kindergarten through grade eight.
Textbooks adopted in accordance with the provisions of this Part shall be used by the public
schools of the State except as provided in G.S. 115C-98(b1)."
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of nine hundred thirty million dollars ($930,000,000) in recurring
funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to allocate one teacher assistant to
every classroom serving students in kindergarten through grade five.
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of four million three hundred thousand dollars ($4,300,000) in
recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide grants pursuant to
G.S. 115C-269.31.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 948-First Edition Page 3